Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-166
Unlawful use of terms; penalty.

Any person who violates sections 1-151 to 1-161 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. If a member of the board has reason to believe that any person is liable to punishment under this section, the board may certify the facts to the Attorney General of this state, who may in his or her discretion cause appropriate proceedings to be brought.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 61, p. 77;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 60.